Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 3
REGIONAL CENTERS

Editor's note:

Provisions similar to the provisions of this part 3 were found in article 14 of this title prior to its repeal in 1985.

27-10.5-301. Regional centers for persons with developmental disabilities.

There are hereby established state regional centers in Wheat Ridge, Pueblo, and Grand Junction. The essential object of such regional centers shall be to provide state operated services and supports to persons with developmental disabilities. A regional center may not permit the cultivation, use, or consumption of retail marijuana on its premises.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 1011, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1390, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-283), ch. 332, p. 1896, § 17, effective May 28.

27-10.5-302. Directors.

The executive director shall appoint, pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution, a director for each regional center. Persons appointed must be skilled and trained administrators with experience related to the needs of persons with developmental disabilities. The director of each regional center shall appoint such other employees in accordance with section 13 of article XII of the state constitution as are necessary to carry out the functions of the regional center.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 1012, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1390, § 38, effective July 1.

27-10.5-303. Annual reports - publications.

The director of each regional center shall report to the executive director at such times and on such matters as the executive director may require. Publications of each regional center circulated in quantity outside the department shall be subject to the approval and control of the executive director.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part 3 added, p. 1012, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1391, § 39, effective July 1.

27-10.5-304. Admissions.

There may be admitted to any regional center persons with developmental disabilities who have been ordered placed in a regional center pursuant to section 27-10.5-110, if the applicant or legal guardian is a bona fide resident of Colorado.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 1391, § 40, effective July 1, 1992.)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 1012, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1391, § 40, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the interstate compact on mental health, see part 10 of article 60 of title 24.

27-10.5-305. Endowment fund.

There is hereby authorized the regional center endowment fund. Any parent, person, corporation, or institution may contribute to said endowment fund. The bylaws to be provided by the department of human services shall prescribe the different endowments; but the investments from said endowment fund shall be in state, county, or city bonds or in first mortgages on improved realty for not more than forty percent of the actual value of such realty.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 1012, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1391, § 41, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2712, § 288, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

27-10.5-306. Gifts - receipt and disposition.

Each regional center is hereby authorized to receive gifts, legacies, devises, and conveyances of property, real or personal, that may be made, given, or granted to or for such regional center. If the gifts are not prescribed, the director, with approval of the executive director, shall exercise such authority and make such disposition of the gift property as may be for the best interest of said regional center.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 1012, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1391, § 42, effective July 1.

27-10.5-307. Expenditures.

No moneys shall be paid by the state treasurer out of any other appropriation for, or moneys belonging to, a regional center, except upon warrants of the controller upon vouchers in favor of the persons to whom the state is indebted on account of said regional center and certified by the director of said regional center.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 1013, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1392, § 43, effective July 1.

27-10.5-308. Buildings - Pueblo. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 1013, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1146, § 17, effective May 18.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 1392, § 44, effective July 1.

27-10.5-309. Lease of property at regional center - regional center enterprise fund - creation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 1013, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1392, § 45, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1345, § 3, effective May 27.

27-10.5-310. Regional centers task force - creation - members - recommendations - utilization study - reporting - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1338), ch. 298, p. 1247, § 1, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

Subsection (12) provided for the repeal of this section, effective December 31, 2015. (See L. 2014, p. 1247.)

27-10.5-311. Regional centers - waiver beds - prohibition on closure or sale - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (SB 15-243), ch. 131, p. 405, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-178), ch. 274, p. 1135, § 2, effective June 10.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2017. (See L. 2016, p. 1135.)

27-10.5-312. Grand Junction regional center campus - vacating and sale or transfer - legislative declaration - definition - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (SB 16-178), ch. 274, p. 1133, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2018:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 18-1049), ch. 134, p. 887, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2019:

(3)(a) and (3)(b)(I) amended, (HB 19-1062), ch. 20, p. 74, § 1, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective June 30, 2021. (See L. 2016, p. 1133.)

27-10.5-313. Regional center - employees - adult protective services data system check.

On and after January 1, 2019, prior to employment, a regional center shall submit the name of a person who will be providing direct care, as defined in section 26-3.1-101 (3.5), to an at-risk adult, as defined in section 26-3.1-101 (1.5), as well as any other required identifying information, to the department of human services for a check of the Colorado adult protective services data system pursuant to section 26-3.1-111, to determine if the person is substantiated in a case of mistreatment of an at-risk adult.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1284), ch. 272, p. 1505, § 14, effective May 31.

27-10.5-314. Former Teller institute property.

Except as described in subsection (2) of this section, as soon as each person who was receiving services on May 24, 2022, at the former Teller institute federal Indian boarding school property, now owned by the department and operated as a regional center, is transitioned to a residence other than a residence at the regional center, the department shall vacate the property and shall sell all or a portion of the property, or transfer all or a portion of the property, to a state institution of higher education, a local government, a state agency, or a federally recognized tribe in Colorado that is impacted by the operation of the Teller institute.

The department shall not sell or transfer the property, or any portion of the property, until after the identification and mapping of any graves of Native American students buried at the federal Indian boarding school that was located on the property and until after the department, in consultation with tribal governments, develops a plan to acknowledge the abuse and victimization of students and families related to the operation of the federal Indian boarding school located on the property.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1327), ch. 216, p. 1424, § 3, effective May 24.

Cross references:

For the short title ("SALT Parity Act") in HB 22-1327, see section 1 of chapter 216, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.